Tennessee, session 114, SB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-2-125(f)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (A) and substituting:
(A) Each month, a group health plan or health insurance issuer shall provide
electronic health insurance claims data for state residents to the commissioner or a
designated entity authorized by the commissioner, in accordance with standards and
procedures recommended by the Tennessee health information committee pursuant to
subdivision (c)(2) and adopted by the commissioner by rule.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1001
003131
- 1 -